Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 1. Certificate of Authority

§ 15.01.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this State until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section:

maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

holding meetings of the board of directors or members or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

maintaining bank accounts;

maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of memberships or securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with respect to those securities;

selling through independent contractors;

soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this State before they become contracts;

creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts;

owning, without more, real or personal property;

conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 30 days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

transacting business in interstate commerce.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.02.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this State without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding or raise a counterclaim, crossclaim, or affirmative defense in any court in this State until it obtains a certificate of authority.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in this State without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding or raise a counterclaim, crossclaim, or affirmative defense based on that cause of action in any court in this State until the foreign corporation or its successor or assignee obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor, or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation or its successor requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court may further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

A foreign corporation that transacts business in this State without a certificate of authority is liable to the State for:

a civil penalty of $50.00 for each day, not to exceed a total of $10,000.00 for each year, it transacts business in this State without a certificate of authority;

an amount equal to the fees due under this title during the period it transacted business in this State without a certificate of authority; and

other penalties imposed by law.

The Attorney General may file an action in the Civil Division of Superior Court to collect the penalties due under this subsection and to restrain a foreign corporation not in compliance with this chapter from doing business within this State.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997; amended

2015, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § C.11.

§ 15.03.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this State by delivering an application to the Secretary of State. The application must set forth:

the name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this State, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of section 15.06 of this title;

the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

the date of incorporation and period of duration;

the street address of its principal office;

the address of its registered office in this State and the name of its registered agent at that office;

the names and usual business or home addresses of its current directors and officers;

whether the foreign corporation has members; and

whether the corporation, if it had been incorporated in this State, would be a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import) duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.04.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State must obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

its corporate name;

the period of its duration; or

the state or country of its incorporation.

The requirements of section 15.03 of this title for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.05.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this State subject, however, to the right of the State to revoke the certificate as provided in this title.

A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same rights and enjoys the same privileges as, and except as otherwise provided by this title is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

Except as provided in subsection 11.07(a) of this title, this title does not authorize this State to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.06.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of section 4.01 of this title, the foreign corporation to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this State:

may add the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” or “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or “ltd.,” to its corporate name for use in this State; or

may use an available trade name to transact business in this State if its corporate name is unavailable and it delivers to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the resolution of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting the trade name.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the corporate name (including a trade name) of a foreign corporation must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from reserved or registered trade names or corporate names.

A foreign corporation may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use in this State the name of another corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this State that is not distinguishable upon the records from the name applied for by submitting to the Secretary of State a satisfactory written form indicating the other corporation’s consent and change of name.

A foreign corporation may use in this State the name (including the trade name) of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this State if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this State and the foreign corporation:

has merged with the other corporation;

has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State changes its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of section 4.01 of this title, it may not transact business in this State under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements of section 4.01 and obtains an amended certificate of authority under section 15.04 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.07.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State must continuously maintain in this State:

a registered office with the same address as that of its registered agent; and

a registered agent, who may be:

an individual who resides in this State and whose office is identical with the registered office;

a domestic business or nonprofit corporation whose office is identical with the registered office; or

a foreign business or nonprofit corporation authorized to trans- act business in this State whose office is identical with the registered office.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.08.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

its name;

the street address of its current registered office;

if the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of its new registered office;

the name of its current registered agent;

if the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of its new registered agent and the new agent’s written consent (either on the statement or attached to it) to the appointment; and

that after the change or changes are made, the street addresses of its registered office and the office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the street address of its business office, the agent may change the address of the registered office of any foreign corporation for which the agent is the registered agent by notifying the corporation in writing of the change and signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change that complies with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and recites that the corporation has been notified of the change.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.09.
Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation.

The registered agent of a foreign corporation may resign as agent by signing and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing the original and two exact or conformed copies of a statement of resignation. The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

After filing the statement, the Secretary of State shall attach the filing receipt to one copy and mail the copy and receipt to the registered office if not discontinued. The Secretary of State shall mail the other copy to the foreign corporation at its principal office address shown in its most recent biennial report.

The agency is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the 31st day after the date on which the statement was filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 15.10.
Service on foreign corporation.

The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State is the corporation’s agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its principal office shown in its application for a certificate of authority or in its most recent biennial report filed under section 16.22 of this title if the foreign corporation:

has no registered agent or its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served;

has withdrawn from transacting business in this State under section 15.20 of this title; or

has had its certificate of authority revoked under section 15.31 of this title.

Service is perfected under subsection (b) of this section at the earliest of:

the date the foreign corporation receives the mail;

the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the foreign corporation; or

five days after its deposit in the U.S. mail, as evidenced by the postmark if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a foreign corporation.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.